Utah statutes.
13-24-3.   Injunctive relief.
(1)  Actual or threatened misappropriation may be enjoined.  Upon application
to the court, an injunction shall be terminated when the trade secret has
ceased to exist, but the injunction may be continued for an additional
reasonable period of time in order to eliminate commercial advantage that
otherwise would be derived from the misappropriation.
(2)  In exceptional circumstances, an injunction may condition future use upon
payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time for
which use could have been prohibited.  Exceptional circumstances include, but
are not limited to, a material and prejudicial change of position prior to
acquiring knowledge or reason to know of misappropriation that renders a
prohibitive injunction inequitable.
(3)  In appropriate circumstances, affirmative acts to protect a trade secret
may be compelled by court order.
